Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1614
Civil penalties; Attorney General; duties.

Any person who violates section 59-1603 or 59-1604 or the terms of any injunction issued as provided in the Consumer Protection Act shall forfeit and pay a civil penalty of not more than five hundred thousand dollars.

Any person who violates section 59-1602 shall pay a civil penalty of not more than two thousand dollars for each violation, except that such penalty shall not apply to any radio or television broadcasting station which broadcasts, or to any publisher, printer, or distributor of any newspaper, magazine, billboard, or other advertising medium who publishes, prints, or distributes advertising in good faith without knowledge of its false, deceptive, or misleading character and no such good faith publication, printing, or distribution shall be considered a violation of section 59-1602.

For the purpose of this section, the district court which issues any injunction shall retain jurisdiction, and the cause shall be continued, and in such cases the Attorney General acting in the name of the state may petition for the recovery of civil penalties.

With respect to violations of sections 59-1603 and 59-1604, the Attorney General, acting in the name of the state, may seek recovery of such penalties in a civil action.

Laws 1974, LB 1028, § 21;

Laws 1980, LB 186, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 1278, § 30;

Laws 2016, LB835, § 23.